apertium-br-fr/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="sk/aon__n">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aoñ</l>
          <r>aon<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aon</l>
          <r>aon<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>inier</l>
          <r>aon<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>aonioù</l>
          <r>aon<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="k/arreg__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arreg</l>
          <r>arreg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erreg</l>
          <r>arreg<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	

    <pardef n="lanne/g__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gi</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>goù</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ier</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  </pardef>	
	
    <pardef n="/erv__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irvi</l>
          <r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ervioù</l>
          <r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	  </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="skritell/ig__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oùigoù</l>
          <r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="merc’h/ig__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edigoù</l>
          <r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	

    <pardef n="paotr/ig__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ig</l>
          <r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>edigoù</l>
          <r>ig<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	

	
    <pardef n="babig__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	  
	  
    </pardef>

	
    <pardef n="kentel__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ioù</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="boutellerez__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ioù</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>	  
	  
    </pardef>
	
	
    <pardef n="munut/enn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>enn</l>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="sae__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kart/enn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azh</l>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>où</l>
          <r>enn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="boultouz__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ion</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>	

    <pardef n="merienaer__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ion</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>		
	
    <pardef n="/oan__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oan</l>
          <r>oan<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oaned</l>
          <r>oan<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ein</l>
          <r>oan<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="besrou/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anez</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>anezed</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="evn__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="serc’h__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	
    <pardef n="k/azh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azh</l>
          <r>azh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>izhier</l>
          <r>azh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azhez</l>
          <r>azh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azhezed</l>
          <r>azh<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="furig"><i>furig</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maj"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aj</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tonton"><par n="initial-t"/><i>onton</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skaon"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/aon__n"/></e>
	<e lm="lanneg"><i>lanne</i><par n="lanne/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karreg"><par n="initial-k"/><i></i><par n="k/arreg__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boutellerez"><par n="initial-b"/><i>outellerez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dornerez"><par n="initial-d"/><i>ornerez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwrierez"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>rierez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kannerez"><par n="initial-k"/><i>annerez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="palataerez"><par n="initial-p"/><i>alataerez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pouezerez"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ouezerez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skaoterez"><i>skaoterez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="splujerez"><i>splujerez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yenerez"><i>yenerez</i><par n="boutellerez__n"/></e>
	<e lm="babig"><par n="initial-b"/><i>abig</i><par n="babig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="serc’h"><i>serc’h</i><par n="serc’h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boultouz"><par n="initial-b"/><i>oultouz</i><par n="boultouz__n"/></e>
    <e lm="merienaer"><par n="initial-m"/><i>erienaer</i><par n="merienaer__n"/></e>
    <e lm="choukenn"><i>choukenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garidenn"><par n="initial-g"/><i>aridenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
      <e lm="kefredi"><par n="initial-k"/><p><l>efredi</l><r>efridi</r></p><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="malgudenn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>algudenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skornenn"><i>skornenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kartenn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>art</i><par n="kart/enn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diwallerezh"><par n="initial-d"/><i>iwallerezh</i><par n="kentel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jederez"><i>jederez</i><par n="kentel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kroaz"><par n="initial-k"/><i>roaz</i><par n="kentel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nadoz-aer"><i>nadoz</i><par n="kentel__n"/><p><l>-aer</l><r><g>-aer</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="skeul-gordenn"><i>skeul</i><par n="kentel__n"/><p><l>-</l><r><g>-</g></r></p><par n="initial-k"/><p><l>ordenn</l><r><g>ordenn</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="tavarn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>avarn</i><par n="kentel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prezegennig"><par n="initial-p"/><i>rezegenn</i><par n="skritell/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skritellig"><i>skritell</i><par n="skritell/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="c’hoarig"><i>c’hoar</i><par n="merc’h/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="merc’hig"><par n="initial-m"/><i>erc’h</i><par n="merc’h/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plac’hig"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lac’h</i><par n="merc’h/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="yarig"><i>yar</i><par n="merc’h/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aelig"><i>ael</i><par n="paotr/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="labousig"><i>labous</i><par n="paotr/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leonig"><i>leon</i><par n="paotr/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="loenig"><i>loen</i><par n="paotr/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paotrig"><par n="initial-p"/><i>aotr</i><par n="paotr/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="peskig"><par n="initial-p"/><i>esk</i><par n="paotr/ig__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oan"><i/><par n="/oan__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bannlev"><par n="initial-b"/><i>annlev</i><par n="kentel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="devarn"><par n="initial-d"/><i>evarn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="garvuhezegan"><par n="initial-g"/><i>arvuhezegan</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kinkladurezh"><par n="initial-k"/><i>inkladurezh</i><par n="kentel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krennbaotr"><par n="initial-k"/><i>rennbaotr</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="melladenn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>elladenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morzen"><par n="initial-m"/><i>orzen</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="besroue"><par n="initial-b"/><i>esrou</i><par n="besrou/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bountadenn"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ountadenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bezu"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ezu</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kazh"><par n="initial-k"/><i></i><par n="k/azh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="braventez"><par n="initial-b"/><i>raventez</i><par n="kentel__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faraon"><i>faraon</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mogn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ogn</i><par n="evn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="munutenn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>unut</i><par n="munut/enn__n"/></e>
    <e lm="touadenn"><par n="initial-t"/><i>ouadenn</i><par n="sae__n"/></e>
